District of Columbia statutes.
8-1003

Repealed

Definitions.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-226, § 4, 36 DCR 595
Mar. 15, 1990, D.C. Law 8-93, § 2(a), 37 DCR 780
Sept. 8, 1990, D.C. Law 8-154, § 2(a), 37 DCR 4045
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 19(a), 40 DCR 6311
Sept. 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-178, § 3(a), 41 DCR 5205
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-154, § 301(g), 61 DCR 9971
1981 Ed., § 6-3403.
For present law, see Chapters 10B and 10C of this title.